Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.150

Lien creditors to be brought in.

Before making an order of sale, if lien creditors, other than those by judgment or decree, have not been made parties, the court, on motion of either party, shall order the plaintiff to file a supplemental complaint, making such creditors defendants.

[Code 1881 s 566; 1877 p 119 s 571; 1869 p 136 s 519; RRS s 852.]